Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 1. General Provisions Relative to Corporations

For text of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, which became effective January 1, 1988, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

§79-1-1.
Automatic extension of corporate charters for certain corporations under certain circumstances.

If a business corporation was created (i) for a limited period of existence, and (ii) before April 18, 1988, the life of the business corporation shall be perpetual if the business corporation continues to do business for thirty (30) days after March 14, 2011.

If a nonprofit corporation was created (i) for a limited period of existence, and (ii) before January 1, 1988, the life of the nonprofit corporation shall be perpetual if the nonprofit corporation continues to do business for thirty (30) days after March 14, 2011.

If a business or nonprofit corporation (a) has a limited period of existence that expired before March 14, 2011, and (b) the business or nonprofit corporation continues to do business for thirty (30) days after March 14, 2011, the life of that corporation shall be perpetual. The corporation’s charter and articles of incorporation shall be deemed to have been automatically amended before the end of the limited period of existence to state that the corporation’s life shall be perpetual. No further action on the part of the corporation is necessary to execute the provisions of this subsection.

Any corporation may, after March 14, 2011, amend its articles of incorporation to provide for a limited period of existence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5325.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 308, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1956, ch. 174, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2011.).

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

Business corporations, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 74 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 111.

Mississippi Business Organizations Laws Annotated, 2004 Edition (Michie).

§79-1-3.
Gifts and donations.

In addition to all other powers granted by law, every corporation organized or existing under the laws of this state shall have power, from its earnings, to make gifts, donations, or contributions for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, religious, or educational purposes, which gifts, donations, or contributions shall be charged by such corporation to operating expenses. The specific grant of such power by this section shall not be construed as raising any presumption or implication that such power has not heretofore existed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5325.7; Laws, 1952, ch 227.

Power of business corporations to make gifts and donations, see § 79-4-3.02.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1801 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1041.

§79-1-5.
Execution of proxies by fiduciary without order or direction of court.

Without obtaining the order or direction of any court or the judge thereof, in vacation, any fiduciary, including those acting as executor, administrator, guardian, agent or trustee, owning corporate stock registered in the name of the fiduciary, as such, or in the name of another for the convenience of the fiduciary, or in the names of more than one fiduciary, whether the corporation issuing such stock is foreign or domestic, may, in addition to the voting rights now vested in such fiduciary, execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, a proxy or proxies to others for the voting of such corporate stock, and may waive notice of and give consent to any meeting of stockholders of any corporation, regular or special, or a meeting of property owners, or cause such to be done, and may authorize in writing any action which could be taken by stockholders in meeting assembled, where such consent is authorized by statute, charter or certificate of incorporation, or bylaws, or cause such written consent to be given, but subject always to the following limitations:

In granting any proxy, reasonable care must be exercised in deciding who shall act as proxy and whether or not instructions as to the voting of said stock shall be given to such proxy.

If there are two or more fiduciaries acting, the proxy shall be executed by, and voting instructions shall be issued by, agreement of all fiduciaries or a majority of them.

In the event the manner or method of voting, or the purposes to be accomplished, are fixed by the instrument or instruments appointing said fiduciaries, the directions contained therein shall govern.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5326.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 178.

Misrepresentation in proxy solicitation-state cases. 20 A.L.R.4th 1287.

§79-1-7.
Defective organization not a defense.

It shall not be a defense to any suit against a corporation that there was a defect or informality in its organization.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 841; 1906, § 906; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4078; 1930, § 4154; 1942, § 5333.

As to defense of ultra vires, see § 79-4-3.04.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 188 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 125.

§79-1-9.
Social, civil and political rights of employees protected.

Any corporation doing business in this state shall be liable to a penalty of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) for every unlawful interference with the social, civil, or political rights of any of its agents or employees, and the same may be recovered by suit, to be brought by the injured party.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 840; 1906, § 905; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4077; 1930, § 4156; 1942, § 5335.

Constitutional provision for protection of social, civil, or political rights of corporate agents and employees, see Miss. Const. § 191.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts rights as stockholder. 84 A.L.R.3d 1107.

Right to discharge allegedly “at will” employee as affected by employer’s promulgation of employment policies as to discharge. 33 A.L.R.4th 120.

Liability for discharge of at-will employee for in-plant complaints or efforts relating to working conditions affecting health or safety. 35 A.L.R.4th 1031.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees. 51 A.L.R.4th 702.

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment. 51 A.L.R.5th 1.

Prohibiting public employee from running for elective office as violation of employee’s federal constitutional rights. 44 A.L.R. Fed. 306.

Dissemination of adverse employment references by former employer as unlawful employment practice under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS § 2000e-2(a)(1)). 50 A.L.R. Fed. 722.

Circumstances in Title VII employment discrimination cases (42 USCS §§ 2000e et seq.) which warrant finding of “constructive discharge” of discriminatee who resigns employment. 55 A.L.R. Fed. 418.

Propriety, under unfair labor practice provisions of National Labor Relations Act (29 USCS § 158(a)), of employer’s selective discipline of employees who are union officials and who participated in unauthorized strike. 66 A.L.R. Fed. 801.

Propriety of treating separate entities as one for determining number of employees required by Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.S. § 2000e(b)) for action against “employer.” 160 A.L.R. Fed. 441.

§79-1-11.
May execute bond in suits.

Any corporation, under the signature of its president or other authorized officer, agent, or attorney, may execute, without affixing the corporate seal, all bonds which shall be necessary at the commencement or during the progress of any case to a final determination, and such bonds shall be binding on the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 7; 1871, § 2411; 1880, § 1035; 1892, § 842; 1906, § 907; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4079; 1930, § 4157; 1942, § 5336.

§79-1-13.
Property and franchise of corporation salable under judgment.

When judgment shall be rendered against any corporation, all its property, real and personal, and its franchise shall be liable to be seized and sold in satisfaction thereof; and the sale shall vest the title to the franchise in the purchaser, with all privileges and immunities; and the officer making the sale shall immediately put him in possession; and the purchaser may recover any penalties imposed for injuries to the franchise, and shall also discharge all the duties imposed by the charter on the corporate body, and be liable to like penalties as the original stockholders which may accrue after his purchase of the franchise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 10; 1871, § 2414; 1880, § 1038; 1892, § 845; 1906, § 910; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4082; 1930, § 4158; 1942, § 5337.

Sales of property in quo warranto proceedings, see § 11-39-33.

Executions generally, see §§ 13-3-111 et seq.

This section [Code 1942, § 5337] does not refer to primary franchise of corporation, but to its secondary or special franchise. Gulf Refining Co. v. Cleveland Trust Co., 166 Miss. 759, 108 So. 158, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 488 (Miss. 1926).

Franchise is special privilege conferred by governmental authority, and which does not belong to citizens of the country generally as matter of common right. Gulf Refining Co. v. Cleveland Trust Co., 166 Miss. 759, 108 So. 158, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 488 (Miss. 1926).

Primary franchise of corporation cannot be sold under execution on judgment, but its special and secondary franchises may be so sold. Gulf Refining Co. v. Cleveland Trust Co., 166 Miss. 759, 108 So. 158, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 488 (Miss. 1926).

A corporation cannot defeat the right of its creditors to sell the equity of redemption by executing a deed of trust with long time to run, etc.; this would palpably violate the section [Code 1942, § 5337]. Vicksburg & M. R. Co. v. McCutchen, 52 Miss. 645, 1876 Miss. LEXIS 270 (Miss. 1876).

39 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 699, Franchisor’s Liability for Acts of Franchisee.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1342 et seq.

§79-1-15.
Franchise redeemable within six months.

Those persons who were stockholders at the time of the sale of the franchise of a corporation may redeem the franchise which has been sold under execution at any time within six (6) months from the date of sale, by paying or tendering to the purchaser the amount paid by him, with ten per centum thereon; but shall not be entitled to any allowance for the profits received by the purchaser in the meantime.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 11; 1871, § 2415; 1880, § 1039; 1892, § 846; 1906, § 911; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4083; 1930, § 4159; 1942, § 5338.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 630.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1343.

§79-1-17.
On dissolution, assets vested in stockholders.

On the dissolution of any corporation, either by judgment or otherwise, all its real and personal estate shall be vested in the stockholders therein, in their respective proportions, who shall hold the same as tenants in common; but this section shall not extend to any property except that which the corporation might lawfully have held without forfeiting the same to the state. Debts due to and from the corporation shall not be extinguished by its dissolution, but debts due from the corporation shall be a charge upon its property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 21; 1880, § 1040; 1892, § 847; 1906, § 912; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4084; 1930, § 4172; 1942, § 5354.

Administrative dissolution of business corporations, see §§ 79-4-14.20 et seq.

Upon the dissolution of a corporation, the property and assets of the corporation constitute a trust fund for the benefit of its creditors and stockholders. Franks v. Receiver of Booneville Banking Co., 202 Miss. 858, 32 So. 2d 859, 1947 Miss. LEXIS 349 (Miss. 1947).

Automatic transfer or investing of ownership in stockholder upon dissolution of corporation is not a sale to the stockholder. Urschel v. Stone, 198 Miss. 105, 21 So. 2d 466, 1945 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1945).

The provisions of this section [Code 1942, § 5354] do not deprive a corporation of its rights, in good faith, to dispose of its property, or create such a trust as affects this right when exercised in good faith. Sells v. Rosedale Grocery & Com. Co., 72 Miss. 590, 17 So. 236, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 9 (Miss. 1895).

Statute making “debts” due from corporation a charge upon its property after dissolution includes tort demands. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Where a corporation has transferred all its property to another and ceased to do business, its property may, in equity, be subjected to the demand of its creditors while in the hands of the purchasing corporation. Vicksburg & Y. C. Tel. Co. v. Citizens' Tel. Co., 79 Miss. 341, 30 So. 725, 1901 Miss. LEXIS 76 (Miss. 1901).

Corporation’s existence as debtor is continued after dissolution only for purposes of suit against it for adjudication of debt or demand upon its merits, and creditor, upon obtaining judgment against corporation, may pursue stockholders to whom corporation’s assets have been distributed. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Failure of creditor of corporation receiving notice of dissolution thereof to file claim does not result in canceling or barring claim. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Express reservation by statute of rights of creditors of corporation after dissolution carries with it necessarily reasonable means for enforcement of rights so preserved. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Persons asserting claims against corporation after final decree for corporation’s liquidation was entered and liquidator discharged were not required to obtain permission of chancery court to sue corporation, and suit against liquidator was no longer proper. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Proceeding by stockholders of a corporation by bill in equity, averring its insolvency, with no party defendant, and praying for a receiver to collect its assets and distribute pro rata to its creditors, was absolutely void. Smith v. Ely & Walker Dry Goods Co., 79 Miss. 266, 30 So. 653, 1901 Miss. LEXIS 54 (Miss. 1901).

Net book value of the assets at time of dissolution based on cost to the corporation, rather than the “liquidation value” of such asset, continues to represent the cost of the assets for purposes of computing depletion and depreciation allowances on a stockholder’s interest in such assets after dissolution, in determining the stockholder’s income tax. Urschel v. Stone, 198 Miss. 105, 21 So. 2d 466, 1945 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1945).

An agreement between the existing members of a local lodge of a fraternal society to abandon the lodge as such and to discontinue its corporate functions, to divide up the personal property, together with an arrangement to rent the property and share in the rent thereof was effective to determine the status of the parties thereto as tenants in common as would have been their status after formal surrender, notwithstanding there was no legal dissolution.
Woodville Lodge, Grand United Order of Odd Fellows v. Poole, 190 Miss. 798, 1 So. 2d 780, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 98 (Miss. 1941).

Preferred stockholders’ rights, upon liquidation or dissolution, to dividends.
25 A.L.R.2d 788.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1638 et seq.

§§79-1-19 through79-1-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.05, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1906, §§ 915, 917-919; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4089, 4091-4093; 1930, §§ 4160, 4162, 4163, 4166; 1942, §§ 5339, 5341, 5342, 5345; Laws, 1908, ch. 123]

Former Sections 79-1-19 through 79-1-27 contained provisions applicable to foreign corporations. For present similar provisions of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, which became effective January 1, 1988, see §§ 79-4-15.01 et seq.

§79-1-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1906, § 920; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4094; 1930, § 4167; 1942, § 5346; Laws, 1908, ch. 123; repealed, Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.05, effective from and after January 1, 1988]

Section 79-1-29 was previously repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.05, effective from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-1-31.
Extent of the chapter.

The provisions of this chapter, when not limited by their terms, shall apply to all corporations whatever, where the subject matter is not elsewhere prescribed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 860; 1906, § 937; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4115; 1930, § 4177; 1942, § 5359.

The powers of a corporation created under general laws are derived from the statute and not from its charter provisions, and a corporation chartered under Code 1892, Chapter 25, can exercise only the powers therein prescribed. Woodbury v. McClurg, 78 Miss. 831, 29 So. 514, 1901 Miss. LEXIS 131 (Miss. 1901).

For text of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, which became effective January 1, 1988, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

§§79-3-1 through79-3-293.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.06, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§§79-3-1 through79-3-11. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-01 through 5309-6; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 1-6]

§79-3-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 7]

§79-3-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 8; Laws, 1983, ch. 370]

§79-3-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 9]

§79-3-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-14; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 10]

§79-3-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-21; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 11]

§79-3-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 12]

§79-3-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 431, § 5]

§§79-3-27 through79-3-35. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-31 through 5309-35; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 14-18]

§79-3-37. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-36; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 19; Laws, 1980, ch. 404]

§79-3-39. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-23; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 431, § 5]

§79-3-41. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-38; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 21]

§79-3-43. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-39; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 22; Laws, 1966, ch. 285, § 1; 1968, ch. 273, § 1]

§§79-3-45 through79-3-53. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-40, 5309-51 through 5309-54; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 23-27]

§79-3-55. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-55; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 28; Laws, 1981, ch. 371, § 1]

§79-3-57. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-56; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 29; Laws, 1981, ch. 371, § 2]

§§79-3-59 through79-3-65. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-57 through 5309-60; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 30-33]

§79-3-67. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-71; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 34; Laws, 1981, ch. 387, § 1]

§§79-3-69 through79-3-81. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-72 through 5309-78; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 35-41]

§§79-3-83 through79-3-87. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-81 through 5309-83; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 42-4]

§§79-3-89 through79-3-105. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-91 through 5309-93, 5309-111, 5309-112, 5309-121, 5309-122; Laws, 1967, ch. 235, §§ 45-53]

§79-3-107. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-123; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 54; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 17; Laws, 1983, ch. 403, § 2]

§§79-3-109 through79-3-113. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-124 through 5309-126; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 55-57]

§§79-3-115 through79-3-121. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-131 through 5309-134; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 58-61]

§79-3-123. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-135; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 62; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess. ch. 14; Laws, 1983, ch. 403, § 3]

§§79-3-125 through79-3-139. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-136 through 5309-145; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 63-70]

§79-3-141. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-151; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 71; Laws, 1981, ch. 334, § 1]

§79-3-142. [Laws, 1984, ch. 337]

§§79-3-143 and79-3-145. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-152, 5309-153; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 72, 73]

§§79-3-147 through79-3-149. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-154, 5309-155; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 74, 75; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess. chs. 15, 16; Laws, 1983, ch. 403, §§ 4 and 5]

§§79-3-151 through79-3-157. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-156, 5309-157, 5309-161, 5309-162; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 76-79]

§79-3-159. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-171; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 80; Laws, 1985, ch. 449, § 3]

§79-3-161. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-172; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 81]

§79-3-163. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-181; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 82; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess. ch. 13; Laws, 1983, ch. 403, § 6]

§§79-3-165 through79-3-247. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-182 through 5309-192, 5309-201 through 5309-239; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 83-124]

§79-3-249. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-251; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 125; Laws, 1971, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 467, § 9]

§79-3-253. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-261; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 127; Laws, 1975, ch. 467, § 11]

§79-3-255. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-262; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 128; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 14; Laws, 1981, ch. 431, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 381, § 13]

§79-3-257. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-263; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 129; Laws, 1970, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 431, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 381, § 14]

§79-3-259. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-271; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 130; Laws, 1975, ch. 467, § 12]

§79-3-261. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-272; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 131]

§79-3-263. [Codes, 1942, § 5309-273; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, § 132; Laws, 1985, ch. 381, § 15]

§§79-3-265 through79-3-293. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5309-281 through 5309-287, 5309-301 through 5309-304, 5309-311 through 5309-314; Laws, 1962, ch. 235, §§ 133-147]

Political contributions by corporation as criminal offense, see §§ 97-13-15, 97-13-17.

Recovery for discharge for employment in retaliation for filing workers’ compensation claim. 32 A.L.R.4th 1221.

Conduct or activities of employees during off-duty hours as misconduct barring unemployment compensation benefits.
35 A.L.R.4th 691.

Right of employee to injunction preventing employer from exposing employee to tobacco smoke in workplace. 37 A.L.R.4th 480.

Liability for discharge of employee from private employment on ground of political views or conduct. 38 A.L.R.5th 39.

What acts amount to violation of Hatch Act (5 USC §§ 1501-1503) prohibiting political activity of certain state and local employees. 8 A.L.R. Fed. 343.

Employer’s discharge of employee as unlawful employment practice in violation of § 704(a) of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS § 2000e-3(a)) where basis for discharge is employee’s opposition to discriminatory conduct of co-worker. 49 A.L.R. Fed. 712.

What will be deemed a “written interpretation or opinion of the Commission” which employer can assert as defense under § 713(b) of the Equal Employment Opportunity Act (42 USCS § 2000e-12(b)(1)). 54 A.L.R. Fed. 868.

Prohibition of discrimination against, or discharge of, employee because of exercise of right afforded by Occupational Safety and Health Act, under § 11(c)(1) of the act (29 USCS § 660(c)(1)). 66 A.L.R. Fed. 650.

Dismissal of, or other adverse personnel action relating to, public employee for political patronage reasons as violative of First Amendment. 70 A.L.R. Fed. 371.

Preemption of state law wrongful discharge claim, not arising from whistleblowing, by § 541(A) of Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C.S. § 1144(A)). 176 A.L.R. Fed. 433.

Franchises of corporation are (1) corporate or general franchises, which are franchises to exist as corporation; (2) special or secondary franchises, which are certain rights conferred on existing corporation. Gulf Refining Co. v. Cleveland Trust Co., 166 Miss. 759, 108 So. 158, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 488 (Miss. 1926).

Term “corporate franchise” ordinarily refers to primary franchise of corporation; that is, right and privilege granted by state of being corporation and doing such things as are authorized by its charter. Gulf Refining Co. v. Cleveland Trust Co., 166 Miss. 759, 108 So. 158, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 488 (Miss. 1926).

Upon dissolution of oil corporation, all its assets became vested in the stockholders as tenants in common in proportion to their respective stockholdings. Urschel v. Stone, 198 Miss. 105, 21 So. 2d 466, 1945 Miss. LEXIS 172 (Miss. 1945).

A corporation, though insolvent, may prefer creditors by mortgage, sale or assignment, where there is no fraud. Sells v. Rosedale Grocery & Com. Co., 72 Miss. 590, 17 So. 236, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 9 (Miss. 1895).

Claimant who failed to assert tort claim against corporation pursuant to notice given creditors of corporation’s dissolution could, after dissolution distribution to stockholders of assets, and discharge of liquidator, sue corporation for adjudication of merits of claim, preliminary to taking steps against stockholders as distributees of corporation’s assets. Bates v. Mississippi Industrial Gas Co., 173 Miss. 361, 161 So. 133, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 208 (Miss. 1935).

Stockholders’ rights to patent, copyright, or trademark owned by corporation on dissolution thereof.
30 A.L.R.2d 938.